Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1654.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; state treasurer; end-point monitoring of elections and nefarious signal interception The sum of $100,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state treasurer to reimburse counties for end-point monitoring of elections and nefarious signal interception.